Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.020

Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of this title at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to this title are governed by the amendment or repeal.

[ 1989 c 165 s 2.]